Wisconsin, session 2025, AB719.
do enact as follows:AB719,11Section 1. 20.835 (1) (s) of the statutes is amended to read:AB719,2,4220.835 (1) (s) Expenditure restraint incentive Municipality payment program 3account. From the local government fund, a sum sufficient to make the payments 4under s. 79.05 (3), plus the amounts under s. 79.05 (7) 79.06.AB719,25Section 2. 25.491 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB719,2,8625.491 (3) There is established in the local government fund a separate 7account that is designated the “expenditure restraint incentive “municipality 8payment program account” to make the payments under s. 79.05 79.06.AB719,39Section 3. 79.015 of the statutes is amended to read:AB719,2,141079.015 Statement of estimated payments. The department of revenue, on 11or before September 15 of each year, shall provide to each municipality and county 12a statement of estimated payments to be made in the next calendar year to the 13municipality or county under ss. 79.035, 79.036, 79.037, 79.038, 79.039, 79.04, and 1479.05 79.06.AB719,415Section 4. 79.02 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB719,3,21679.02 (2) (b) Subject to ss. 59.605 (4) and 70.995 (14) (b), payments in July 17shall equal 15 percent of the municipality’s or county’s estimated payments under 18ss. 79.035, 79.036, 79.037, 79.038, 79.039, and 79.04 and 100 percent of the 19municipality’s estimated payments under s. 79.05 79.06. Upon certification by the 1department of revenue, the estimated payment under s. 79.05 79.06 may be 2distributed before the 4th Monday in July.AB719,53Section 5. 79.02 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB719,3,7479.02 (3) Subject to s. 59.605 (4), payments to each municipality and county in 5November shall equal that municipality’s or county’s entitlement under ss. 79.035, 679.036, 79.037, 79.038, 79.039, 79.04, and 79.05 79.06 for the current year, minus 7the amount distributed to the municipality or county under sub. (2) (b).AB719,68Section 6. 79.05 (8) of the statutes is created to read:AB719,3,10979.05 (8) Notwithstanding subs. (2) and (3), beginning in 2027, no payments 10shall be made under this section.AB719,711Section 7. 79.06 of the statutes is created to read:AB719,3,151279.06 Municipality payment program. For the distribution in 2027 and in 13subsequent years, each municipality that received a payment under s. 79.05 in 142024, 2025, or 2026 shall receive in each year a payment under this section equal to 15the amount it received under s. 79.05 in 2024, 2025, or 2026, whichever is greatest.AB719,816Section 8. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 17publication, except as follows:AB719,3,1918(1) The treatment of ss. 20.835 (1) (s), 25.491 (3), and 79.02 (2) (b) and (3) 19takes effect on July 1, 2027.AB719,3,2020(2) The treatment of s. 79.015 takes effect on July 1, 2026.AB719,3,2121